Hawaii statutes.
§142-21 Cooperation with federal
authorities. The department of agriculture may cooperate with the United
States Department of Agriculture in its efforts to eradicate bovine
tuberculosis or any other transmissible disease of animals, and may make appraisals
of condemned animals and report on the salvage derived from the sale of the
animals in conformity with the regulations of the United States Department of
Agriculture. [L 1923, c 124, §6; RL 1925, §631; RL 1935, §227; RL 1945, §1081;
RL 1955, §20-22; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §142-21;
am L 1986, c 6, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next